Utah statutes.
53B-2-106.   Duties and responsibilities of the president of each institution -- Approval by board of trustees.

(1) (a)  The president of each institution may exercise grants of power and authority as delegated by the board, as well as the necessary and proper exercise of powers and authority not specifically denied to the institution, its administration, faculty, or students by the board or by law, to assure the effective and efficient administration and operation of the institution consistent with the statewide master plan for higher education.

(b)  The president of each institution may, after consultation with the institution's board of trustees, exercise powers relating to the institution's employees, including faculty and persons under contract with the institution, by implementing any of the following:

(i)  furloughs;

(ii)  reductions in force;

(iii)  benefit adjustments;

(iv)  program reductions or discontinuance;

(v)  early retirement incentives that provide cost savings to the institution; and

(vi)  other measures that provide cost savings to the institution.

(2)  Except as provided by the board, the president of each institution, with the approval of the institution's board of trustees may:

(a) (i)  appoint a secretary, a treasurer, administrative officers, deans, faculty members, and other professional personnel, prescribe their duties, and determine their salaries;

(ii)  appoint support personnel, prescribe their duties, and determine their salaries from the institution's position classification plan, which may:

(A)  be based upon similarity of duties and responsibilities within the institution; and

(B)  as funds permit, provide salary and benefits comparable with private enterprise;

(iii)  adopt policies for:

(A)  employee sick leave use and accrual; and

(B)  service recognition for employees with more than 15 years of employment with the institution; and

(iv)  subject to the authority of, policy established by, and the approval of the board of regents, and recognizing the status of the institutions within the state system of higher education as bodies politic and corporate, appoint attorneys to provide legal advice to the institution's administration and to coordinate legal affairs within the institution.  The board of regents shall coordinate activities of attorneys at the institutions of higher education.  The institutions shall provide an annual report to the board of regents on the activities of appointed attorneys.  These appointed attorneys may not conduct litigation, settle claims covered by the State Risk Management Fund, or issue formal legal opinions but shall, in all respects, cooperate with the Office of the Attorney General in providing legal representation to the institution;

(b)  provide for the constitution, government, and organization of the faculty and administration, and enact implementing rules, including the establishment of a prescribed system of tenure;

(c)  authorize the faculty to determine the general initiation and direction of instruction and of the examination, admission, and classification of students.  In recognition of the diverse nature and traditions of the various institutions governed by the board, the systems of faculty government need not be identical but should be designed to further faculty identification with and involvement in the institution's pursuit of achievement and excellence and in fulfillment of the institution's role as established in the statewide master plan for higher education; and

(d)  enact rules for administration and operation of the institution which are consistent with the prescribed role established by the board, rules enacted by the board, or the laws of the state.  The rules may provide for administrative, faculty, student, and joint committees with jurisdiction over specified institutional matters, for student government and student affairs organization, for the establishment of institutional standards in furtherance of the ideals of higher education fostered and subscribed to by the institution, its administration, faculty, and students, and for the holding of classes on legal holidays, other than Sunday.

(3)  Compensation costs and related office expenses for appointed attorneys shall be funded within existing budgets.

(4)  The State Board of Regents shall establish guidelines relating to the roles and relationships between institutional presidents and boards of trustees, including those matters which must be approved by a board of trustees before implementation by the president.

(5)  This section does not apply to the Utah College of Applied Technology.

